Illinois, session 104th, HB2848.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Sections 52-3.206 and 2-3.207 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.206 new)7    Sec. 2-3.206. School support personnel paid internship 8program.9    (a) Subject to appropriation, the State Board of Education 10shall establish a program of paid internships for students 11enrolled in educator preparation programs in the school 12support personnel endorsement areas of school social worker, 13school psychologist, school counselor, school nurse, and 14speech-language pathologist. 15    (b) A paid internship under the program shall be for one 16academic year and shall continue until the student has met the 17student's internship or field placement requirement as part of 18the educator preparation program in which the student is 19enrolled. 20    (c) Under the program, the rate of pay for the student may 21be no lower than the wage required under Section 4 of the 22Minimum Wage Law. 23    (d) If the amount of funds appropriated for the program is   HB2848- 2 -LRB104 11375 LNS 21463 b1insufficient to cover all internships in a given fiscal year, 2the State Board of Education shall allocate the funds 3available to internships in high need schools or school 4districts. 5    (e) To qualify for a paid internship under the program, 6the student must be supervised by an individual who holds a 7Professional Educator License under Article 21B with an 8endorsement in the student's area of study.  9    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.207 new)10    Sec. 2-3.207. Mentorship and recruitment program.11    (a) Subject to appropriation, the State Board of Education 12shall establish and maintain a mentorship and recruitment 13program to develop and maintain interest in the school support 14personnel endorsement areas of school social worker, school 15psychologist, school counselor, school nurse, and 16speech-language pathologist. The purpose of the program is to 17attract students in high schools, community colleges, and 18undergraduate higher education programs to school support 19personnel professions and to encourage students to continue on 20to complete appropriate educator preparation programs and 21employment in this State's public schools. 22    (b) The State Board of Education shall collaborate with 23the Board of Higher Education, the Illinois Community College 24Board, institutions of higher education, and professional 25associations representing the respective school support   HB2848- 3 -LRB104 11375 LNS 21463 b1personnel endorsement areas to develop the program. 2    (c) If the funding appropriated for the program is 3insufficient to address all areas of this State, the program 4may be limited to those areas of highest need. A pilot program 5must cover all school support personnel endorsement areas.  6    Section 10. The Higher Education Student Assistance Act is 7amended by adding Sections 65.135 and 65.140 as follows: 8    (110 ILCS 947/65.135 new)9    Sec. 65.135. School support personnel educator preparation 10scholarship program. 11    (a) Subject to appropriation, beginning with the 2025-2026 12academic year, the Commission shall establish a school support 13personnel educator preparation scholarship program to annually 14award up to 250 scholarships for school psychology, school 15counseling, school nursing, and school speech-language 16pathology. A person is eligible for a scholarship if the 17person:18        (1) is a United States citizen or eligible noncitizen;19        (2) submits an application to the Commission for a 20    scholarship;21        (3) verifies that the person meets the requirements to 22    enroll in an educator preparation program the successful 23    completion of which will qualify the person for a school 24    support personnel endorsement in the area of school   HB2848- 4 -LRB104 11375 LNS 21463 b1    psychologist, school counselor, school nurse, or 2    speech-language pathologist; and3        (4) agrees to take the coursework necessary to earn a 4    Professional Educator License with a school support 5    personnel endorsement in the area of school psychologist, 6    school counselor, school nurse, or speech-language 7    pathologist.8    (b) If funds are insufficient for a given fiscal year to 9provide all qualified applicants with a scholarship as 10authorized by this Section, the Commission shall allocate the 11available scholarship funds for that fiscal year to qualified 12applicants who submit a complete application on or before a 13date specified by the Commission, based on the following order 14of priority:15        (1) first, to qualified applicants who received a 16    scholarship under this Section in the prior academic year;17        (2) second, to new, qualified applicants who are 18    members of a racial minority as defined in subsection (d); 19    and20        (3) third, to other new, qualified applicants in 21    accordance with this Section.22    (c) Scholarships awarded under this Section shall be 23issued pursuant to rules adopted by the Commission.24    (d) The General Assembly finds that racial minorities are 25underrepresented as school support personnel in elementary and 26secondary schools in this State and it is in the interest of   HB2848- 5 -LRB104 11375 LNS 21463 b1this State to provide them with priority consideration for 2programs that encourage their participation in school support 3personnel fields and thereby foster professions that are more 4reflective of the diversity of the Illinois students and their 5parents those professions serve. A more reflective workforce 6in school support personnel endorsement fields allows for 7improved outcomes for students and better utilization of 8services. Therefore, the Commission should give priority to 9those applicants who are members of a racial minority.10    In this subsection (d), "racial minority" means a person 11who is a citizen of the United States or a lawful permanent 12resident alien of the United States and who is:13        (1) Black (a person having origins in any of the black 14    racial groups in Africa);15        (2) Hispanic (a person of Spanish or Portuguese 16    culture with origins in Mexico, South or Central America, 17    or the Caribbean Islands, regardless of race);18        (3) Asian American (a person having origins in any of 19    the original peoples of the Far East, Southeast Asia, the 20    Indian Subcontinent, or the Pacific Islands); or21        (4) American Indian or Alaskan Native (a person having 22    origins in any of the original peoples of North America).23    In awarding scholarships under this Section, the 24Commission shall give priority to those applicants who are 25members of a racial minority. 26    (e) Each scholarship awarded under this Section shall be   HB2848- 6 -LRB104 11375 LNS 21463 b1applied to the payment of tuition and mandatory fees at the 2University of Illinois, Southern Illinois University, Chicago 3State University, Eastern Illinois University, Governors State 4University, Illinois State University, Northeastern Illinois 5University, Northern Illinois University, or Western Illinois 6University. Each scholarship may be applied to pay tuition and 7mandatory fees required to obtain a Professional Educator 8License under Article 21B of the School Code with a school 9support personnel endorsement in the area of school 10psychologist, school counselor, school nurse, or 11speech-language pathologist.12    (f) The Commission shall make tuition and fee payments 13directly to the qualified institution of higher learning that 14the applicant attends.15    (g) Any person who has accepted a scholarship under this 16Section must, within one year after graduation or termination 17of enrollment in an educator preparation program to obtain a 18Professional Educator License with a school support personnel 19endorsement in the area of school psychologist, school 20counselor, school nurse, or speech-language pathologist, begin 21working in that endorsement area at a public or nonpublic 22not-for-profit preschool, elementary school, or secondary 23school located in this State for at least 2 of the 5 years 24immediately following that graduation or termination, 25excluding, however, from the computation of that 5-year 26period: (i) any time up to 3 years spent in military service,   HB2848- 7 -LRB104 11375 LNS 21463 b1whether such service occurs before or after the person 2graduates; (ii) the time that person is a person with a 3temporary total disability, for a period of time not to exceed 43 years, as established by the sworn affidavit of a qualified 5physician; and (iii) the time that person is seeking and 6unable to find full-time employment in that person's field of 7endorsement at a public or nonpublic not-for-profit preschool, 8elementary school, or secondary school located in this State.9    (h) If a recipient of a scholarship under this Section 10fails to fulfill the work obligation set forth in subsection 11(g), the Commission shall require the recipient to repay the 12amount of the scholarship received, prorated according to the 13fraction of the obligation not completed, at a rate of 14interest equal to 5%, and, if applicable, reasonable 15collection fees. The Commission is authorized to establish 16rules relating to its collection activities for repayment of 17scholarships under this Section. All repayments collected 18under this Section shall be forwarded to the State Comptroller 19for deposit into this State's General Revenue Fund.20    (i) A recipient of a scholarship under this Section is not 21considered to be in violation of the failure to fulfill the 22work obligation under subsection (g) if the recipient (i) 23enrolls on a full-time basis as a graduate student in a course 24of study related to the recipient's field of endorsement at a 25qualified institution; (ii) is serving, not in excess of 3 26years, as a member of the armed services of the United States;   HB2848- 8 -LRB104 11375 LNS 21463 b1(iii) is a person with a temporary total disability for a 2period of time not to exceed 3 years, as established by the 3sworn affidavit of a qualified physician; (iv) is seeking and 4unable to find full-time employment in the recipient's field 5of endorsement at a public or non-public not-for-profit 6preschool, elementary school, or secondary school located in 7this State that satisfies the criteria set forth in subsection 8(g) and is able to provide evidence of that fact; or (v) 9becomes a person with a permanent total disability, as 10established by the sworn affidavit of a qualified physician. 11    (110 ILCS 947/65.140 new)12    Sec. 65.140. School Support Personnel Work Shortage Loan 13Repayment Program.14    (a) To encourage Illinois students to enter the fields of 15school psychology, school counseling, school nursing, and 16school speech-language pathology and to continue to work in 17those fields in public schools in this State, the Commission 18shall, each year, receive and consider applications for loan 19repayment assistance under this Section. This program shall be 20known as the School Support Personnel Work Shortage Loan 21Repayment Program. The Commission shall administer the Program 22and shall adopt all necessary and proper rules to effectively 23implement the Program.24    (b) Beginning July 1, 2025, subject to a separate 25appropriation made for such purposes, the Commission shall   HB2848- 9 -LRB104 11375 LNS 21463 b1award a grant, up to a maximum of $6,500, to each qualified 2applicant. The Commission may encourage the recipient of a 3grant under this Section to use the grant award for repayment 4of the recipient's higher education loans.5    If funds are insufficient for a given fiscal year to 6provide all qualified applicants with a grant as authorized by 7this Section, the Commission shall allocate the available 8grant funds for that fiscal year to qualified applicants who 9submit a complete application on or before a date specified by 10the Commission, based on the following order of priority:11        (1) first, to new, qualified applicants who are 12    members of a racial minority as defined in subsection (e); 13    and14        (2) second, to other new, qualified applicants in 15    accordance with this Section.16    (c) A person is a qualified applicant under this Section 17if the person meets all of the following qualifications:18        (1) The person is a United States citizen or eligible 19    noncitizen.20        (2) The person is a resident of this State.21        (3) The person is a borrower with an outstanding 22    balance due on a higher education loan related to 23    obtaining a degree in either school psychology, school 24    counseling, school nursing, or school speech-language 25    pathology.26        (4) The person has been employed as a school   HB2848- 10 -LRB104 11375 LNS 21463 b1    psychologist, school counselor, school nurse, or school 2    speech-language pathologist by a public preschool, 3    elementary school, or secondary school for at least 12 4    consecutive months.5        (5) The person is currently employed as a school 6    psychologist, school counselor, school nurse, or school 7    speech-language pathologist by a public preschool, 8    elementary school, or secondary school in this State;9    (d) An applicant shall submit an application, in a form 10determined by the Commission, for grant assistance under this 11Section to the Commission. An applicant is required to submit, 12with the application, such supporting documentation as the 13Commission may deem necessary.14    (e) The General Assembly finds that racial minorities are 15underrepresented as school support personnel in preschools, 16elementary schools, and secondary schools in this State and it 17is in the interest of this State to provide them with priority 18consideration for programs that encourage their participation 19in this field and thereby foster school support personnel 20professions that are more reflective of the diversity of the 21Illinois students and their parents those professions will 22serve. A more reflective workforce in school support personnel 23professions allows for improved outcomes for students and 24better utilization of services. Therefore, the Commission 25should give priority to those applicants who are members of a 26racial minority.  HB2848- 11 -LRB104 11375 LNS 21463 b1    In this subsection (e), "racial minority" means a person 2who is a citizen of the United States or a lawful permanent 3resident alien of the United States and who is:4        (1) Black (a person having origins in any of the black 5    racial groups in Africa);6        (2) Hispanic (a person of Spanish or Portuguese 7    culture with origins in Mexico, South or Central America, 8    or the Caribbean Islands, regardless of race);9        (3) Asian American (a person having origins in any of 10    the original peoples of the Far East, Southeast Asia, the 11    Indian Subcontinent, or the Pacific Islands); or12        (4) American Indian or Alaskan Native (a person having 13    origins in any of the original peoples of North America).14    In awarding grants under this Section, the Commission 15shall give priority to those applicants who are members of a 16racial minority.  17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.